Maryland, session 2026, HB0833.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That:
(a) There is a Commission to Advance Lithium–Ion Battery Safety in Maryland.
(b) The Commission consists of:
(1) the following members serving on the Commission on December 31,
2025:
(i) one representative of the Department of the Environment,
appointed by the Secretary of the Environment;
(ii) the following members, appointed by the Director of the
Maryland Energy Administration:
1. one representative of the Maryland Energy
Administration;
2. one representative of a lithium–ion battery manufacturer
or a lithium–ion battery manufacturer trade group; and
3. one representative of a vehicle propulsion battery
manufacturer;
(iii) the State Fire Marshal, or the Fire Marshal’s designee;
(iv) one representative of the Power Plant Research Program,
appointed by the Secretary of Natural Resources;
(v) one representative of the Public Service Commission, appointed
by the Chair of the Public Service Commission;
– 1 –

Ch. 251 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(vi) the following members, appointed by the President of the
Maryland Association of Counties:
1. one representative with a background in emergency
response;
2. one representative with a background in public works; and
3. one representative with a background in climate, clean
energy, and infrastructure;
(vii) one representative of the Professional Firefighters of Maryland,
designated by the President of the Professional Firefighters of Maryland;
(viii) one representative of the Metropolitan Fire Chiefs Association,
designated by the President of the Metropolitan Fire Chiefs Association;
(ix) one representative of the Maryland Fire and Rescue Institute,
designated by the Director of the Maryland Fire and Rescue Institute;
(x) one citizen representative, designated by the President of the
Maryland State Firefighters Association;
(xi) one representative of a public utility in the State;
(xii) one representative of the Maryland Recycling Network;
(xiii) one representative of the Maryland–Delaware Solid Waste
Association;
(xiv) one representative of the vehicle dismantling sector;
(xv) one representative of a battery recycling trade group; and
(xvi) one representative of the grid scale battery energy storage
industry; and
(2) the following additional members:
(i) one representative of the Maryland Port Administration,
appointed by the Secretary of Transportation;
(ii) one representative of the ocean freight shipping industry,
appointed by the Secretary of Transportation;
– 2 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 251
(iii) one representative of the property casualty insurance industry,
appointed by the Maryland Insurance Commissioner;
(iv) one representative of the commercial insurance industry,
appointed by the Maryland Insurance Commissioner;
(v) one representative of the Land and Materials Administration,
appointed by the Secretary of the Environment; and
(vi) one representative of the Towing and Recovery Professionals of
Maryland;
(vii) one representative of the Maryland Turfgrass Council; and
(viii) any other members as determined necessary by the Commission.
(c) The member serving as chair of the Commission on December 31, 2025, shall
continue to serve as chair of the Commission.
(d) The Office of the State Fire Marshal shall provide staff for the Commission.
(e) A member of the Commission:
(1) may not receive compensation as a member of the Commission; but
(2) is entitled to reimbursement for expenses under the Standard State
Travel Regulations, as provided in the State budget.
(f) The Commission shall study and make legislative, regulatory, programmatic,
or other recommendations regarding:
(1) best practices, standards, and guidelines:
(i) to prevent, detect, and suppress lithium–ion battery fires in:
1. consumer and transportation applications; and
2. utility applications, with review and consideration of the
National Fire Prevention Association 855 Standards for Grid Scale Storage and Safety;
(ii) to prevent, detect, and suppress lithium–ion fires at recycling
facilities;
(iii) for reusing, recycling, and decommissioning lithium–ion
batteries; and
– 3 –

Ch. 251 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(iv) for collecting, storing, and recycling lithium–ion batteries;
(2) the viability of extended producer responsibility for lithium–ion
batteries;
(3) training, education, and other information to better inform the public
and first responders regarding lithium–ion battery safety;
(4) battery risks at the Port of Baltimore and on roads, rail, and tunnels
throughout Maryland;
(5) the impacts of battery risk on insurance providers and insurance
coverage availability;
(6) the integration of pending federal regulations and emerging
third–party standards; and
(7) any other global issues the Commission may consider useful for
enhancing the safety and reuse of batteries in the State.
(g) At the discretion of the Commission, the Commission may seek advice and
consultation from outside individuals and entities.
(h) (1) On or before December 1, 2026, the Commission shall submit an interim
report on the progress and status of the Commission to the Legislative Policy Committee,
in accordance with § 2–1257 of the State Government Article.
(2) On or before December 1, 2027, the Commission shall report its findings
and recommendations to the Governor and, in accordance with § 2–1257 of the State
Government Article, the General Assembly.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect June
1, 2026. It shall remain effective for a period of 2 years and 1 month and, at the end of June
30, 2028, this Act, with no further action required by the General Assembly, shall be
abrogated and of no further force and effect.
Approved by the Governor, April 28, 2026.
– 4 –